South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1006.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 4-10-330(A)(1)(i) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (i) greenspace and greenbelt programs; (j) any combination of the projects described in subitems (a) through (h)(i) of this item; SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----